Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB539.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2710. Train length.(a) Total length.--Except as provided in subsection (b), a railroad may not operate a freight train in this Commonwealth with a total length that exceeds 8,500 feet.(b) Consistency with Federal law and regulations.--The commission may promulgate rules and regulations providing an exception to subsection (a), if the exception is required by Federal law or regulation and the commission's rule or regulation is consistent with the Federal law or regulation.(c) Penalties.--A railroad that violates subsection (a) shall be assessed a civil penalty in the following amounts:123456789101112131415161718 (1) A fine of not less than $5,000 nor more than $10,000 for a first offense.(2) A fine of not less than $10,000 nor more than $15,000 for a second offense committed within three years of the first offense.(3) A fine of not less than $15,000 nor more than $20,000 for a third offense and subsequent offenses committed within three years of the first offense.(d) Deposit of penalties.--Notwithstanding section 3315 (relating to disposition of fines and penalties), a penalty collected under this section shall be deposited into the General Fund, deemed an augmentation to any appropriation to the commission and used to administer and enforce this chapter.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Freight locomotive." A railroad locomotive used exclusively for the conveyance of property, regardless of whether coupled with or without a rail car."Freight train." One or more freight locomotives coupled to rail cars.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0539PN0535 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122